Maine, session 132, LD187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §600-C is enacted to read:
§600-C. Labor organization representation service fee for nonparticipants prohibited
An employee who has refrained from joining or participating in the activities of an
organization that is the bargaining agent for the employee for the purposes of representation
and collective bargaining may not be required to pay to the organization a service fee that
represents the employee's pro rata share of those expenditures that are germane to the
organization's representational activities.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §963, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 415, §2, is amended to
read:
2. Not join a union. Refrain from joining or participating in the activities of
organizations for the purposes of representation and collective bargaining, except that an
employee may be required to pay to the organization that is the bargaining agent for the
employee a service fee that represents the employee's pro rata share of those expenditures
that are germane to the organization's representational activities.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §979-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 415, §6, is amended
to read:
2. Not join a union. Refrain from joining or participating in the activities of
organizations for the purposes of representation and collective bargaining, except that an
employee may be required to pay to the organization that is the bargaining agent for the
employee a service fee that represents the employee's pro rata share of those expenditures
that are germane to the organization's representational activities.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §1023, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 415, §10, is amended
to read:
2. Not join a union. Refrain from joining or participating in the activities of
organizations for the purposes of representation and collective bargaining, except that an
employee may be required to pay to the organization that is the bargaining agent for the
employee a service fee that represents the employee's pro rata share of those expenditures
that are germane to the organization's representational activities.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §1283, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 415, §15, is amended
to read:
2. Not join a union. Refrain from joining or participating in the activities of
organizations for the purposes of representation and collective bargaining, except that an
employee may be required to pay to the organization that is the bargaining agent for the
employee a service fee that represents the employee's pro rata share of those expenditures
that are germane to the organization's representational activities.